District of Columbia statutes.
16-907

Parent and child relationship defined.

(a)

The term “legitimate” or “legitimated” means that the parent-child relationship exists for all rights, privileges, duties, and obligations under the laws of the District of Columbia.

(b)

The term “born out of wedlock” solely describes the circumstances that a child has been born to parents who, at the time of its birth, were not married to each other. The term “born in wedlock” solely describes the circumstances that a child has been born to parents who, at the time of its birth, were married to each other.

(c)

A child born to parents in a domestic partnership shall be treated for all legal purposes as a child born in wedlock. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “domestic partnership” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(4), but shall exclude a domestic partnership where a domestic partner is the parent, grandparent, sibling, child, grandchild, niece, nephew, aunt, or uncle of a woman who gives birth to a child.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1, 77 Stat. 561
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-107, title I, § 104, 23 DCR 8737
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 18-33, § 3(b), 56 DCR 4269

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-907.
1973 Ed., § 16-907.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-33 added subsec. (c).